Washington statutes.
RCW 19.30.150

Penalties.

Any person who violates any provisions of this chapter, or who causes or induces another to violate any provisions of this chapter, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars, or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or both.

[ 1955 c 392 s 13.]